Illinois, session 104th, SB2319.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Digital Asset Kiosks Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose and construction. The purpose of this 7Act is to protect the People of Illinois against the fraud and 8scams in digital asset kiosk transactions by providing 9necessary registration requirements, disclosures, and other 10safeguards for customers. This Act shall be liberally 11construed to effectuate its purpose. 12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:13    "Affiliate" means any person that controls, is controlled 14by, or is under common control with another person. As used in 15this paragraph, "control" means the possession, direct or 16indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the 17management and policies of a person.18    "Applicant" means a person that applies for registration 19under this Act.20    "Bank" means a bank, savings bank, savings-and-loan 21association, savings association, or industrial loan company 22chartered under the laws of this State or any other state or   SB2319 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1under the laws of the United States.2    "Blockchain analytics" means the analysis of data from 3blockchains or public distributed ledgers, including 4associated transaction information.5    "Blockchain analytics software" means a software service 6that uses blockchain analytics data to provide risk-specific 7information about digital asset wallet addresses, among other 8things.9    "Charges" means: (i) fees or expenses paid by the 10customer; and (ii) the difference between the market price of 11the digital asset and the price of the digital asset charged to 12the customer.13    "Confidential supervisory information" means information 14or documents obtained by employees, agents, or representatives 15of the Department in the course of any examination, 16investigation, audit, visit, registration, certification, 17review, licensing, or any other regulatory or supervisory 18activity pursuant to this Act, and any record prepared or 19obtained by the Department to the extent that the record 20summarizes or contains information derived from any report, 21document, or record described in this Act.22    "Credit union" means a credit union chartered under the 23laws of this State or any other state or under the laws of the 24United States.25    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 26Professional Regulation.  SB2319 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    "Digital asset" means a digital representation of value 2that is used as a medium of exchange, unit of account, or store 3of value and that is not fiat currency, whether or not 4denominated in fiat currency. "Digital asset" does not include 5any of the following: (i) a digital representation of value 6which a merchant grants, as part of an affinity or rewards 7program, and that cannot be taken from or exchanged with the 8merchant for fiat currency or a digital asset; (ii) a digital 9representation of value that is issued by or on behalf of a 10game publisher, used solely within a gaming platform, has no 11market or application outside of such gaming platform, and 12cannot be converted into, or redeemed for, fiat currency or 13digital assets; or (iii) a digital representation of value 14that is used as part of prepaid cards.15    "Digital asset exchange" means an exchange that 16facilitates the buying, selling, or exchanging of digital 17assets for fiat currency or other digital assets that is 18licensed to conduct business in New York as a Virtual Currency 19Business Activity licensee or in California under the Digital 20Financial Assets Law.21    "Digital asset kiosk" means an automated teller machine 22that facilitates the buying, selling, or exchanging of digital 23assets for fiat currency or other digital assets. 24    "Digital asset kiosk operator" means a registrant or a 25person required to register pursuant to this Act.26    "Existing customer" means a person who transacts with the   SB2319 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1operator following the new customer period. For the avoidance 2of doubt, "existing customer" includes any customer that is 3not a new customer.4    "Federally insured depository institution" shall mean an 5insured depository institution as defined by Section 3(c)(2) 6of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. 1813(c)(2), as 7amended, or an insured credit union as defined by Section 8101(7) of the Federal Credit Union Act, 12 U.S.C. 1752(7), as 9amended.10    "Fiat currency" means a medium of exchange or unit of 11value issued by the United States or a foreign government and 12that is designated as legal tender in its country of issuance.13    "Insolvent" means any of the following: (i) having 14generally ceased to pay debts in the ordinary course of 15business other than as a result of a bona fide dispute, (ii) 16being unable to pay debts as they become due, and (iii) being 17insolvent within the meaning of federal bankruptcy law.18    "Market price of the digital asset" means the current 19market price of a particular digital asset publicly quoted on 20a digital asset exchange for a particular time, subject to any 21rules adopted by the Department.22    "New customer" means a person who has never previously 23transacted with the operator. The new customer shall remain 24defined as such during the earlier of: (i) the customer's 25first 3 transactions after opening an account with the 26operator, or (ii) 7 days after opening an account with the   SB2319 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1operator.2    "Operator" means a person who owns, operates, or manages a 3digital asset kiosk located in this State.4    "Person" means, without limitation, any individual, 5corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, 6proprietorship, syndicate, limited liability company, 7association, joint venture, government, governmental 8subsection, agency or instrumentality, public corporation or 9joint-stock company, or any other organization or legal or 10commercial entity.11    "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible 12medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and 13is retrievable in perceivable form.14    "Registrant" means a person registered under this Act.15    "Request for assistance" means all inquiries, complaints, 16account disputes, and requests for documentation a digital 17asset kiosk operator receives from residents.18    "Responsible individual" means an individual who has 19direct control over, or significant management, policy, or 20decision-making authority with respect to, a person's digital 21asset kiosk business activity in this State.22    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 23Professional Regulation and any authorized representative of 24the Secretary.25    "Service provider" means any person that provides a 26material service to a digital asset kiosk operator in   SB2319 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1connection with the offering or provision by that operator of 2a digital asset business activity in this State, including a 3person that either (i) participates in designing, operating, 4or maintaining the digital asset business activity, or (ii) 5processes transactions relating to a digital asset kiosk 6transaction then unknowingly or incidentally transmitting or 7processing financial data in a manner that the data is 8undifferentiated from other types of data of the same form as 9the person transmits or processes.10    "Tangible net worth" means the aggregate assets of a 11registrant, excluding all intangible assets, less liabilities, 12as determined in accordance with the United States' generally 13accepted accounting principles. 14    Section 15. General powers and duties.15    (a) The Department shall have the following functions, 16powers, and duties, in carrying out its responsibilities under 17this Act:18        (1) to issue or refuse to issue any registration or 19    other authorization under this Act;20        (2) to revoke or suspend for cause any registration or 21    other authorization under this Act;22        (3) to keep records of all registrations or other 23    authorizations under this Act;24        (4) to receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 25    complaints made by any person relating to any digital   SB2319 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    asset kiosk in this State;2        (5) to prescribe the forms of and receive:3            (A) applications for registrations or other 4        authorizations under this Act; and5            (B) all reports and all books and records required 6        to be made under this Act;7        (6) to subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 8    their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and 9    to require the production of any books, papers, or other 10    materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act 11    or other law applicable to digital asset business activity 12    in this State;13        (7) to issue orders against any person:14            (A) if the Secretary has reasonable cause to 15        believe that an unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice 16        has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur;17            (B) if any person has violated, is violating, or 18        is about to violate any law, rule, or written 19        agreement with the Secretary; or20            (C) for the purpose of administering the 21        provisions of this Act or other applicable law.22        (8) to address any inquiries to any digital asset 23    kiosk operator or the directors, officers, or employees of 24    the digital asset kiosk operator, or the affiliates or 25    service providers of the digital asset kiosk operator, in 26    relation to the digital asset kiosk operator's activities   SB2319 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    and conditions or any other matter connected with its 2    affairs, and it shall be the duty of any person so 3    addressed to promptly reply in writing to those inquiries. 4    The Secretary may also require reports from any digital 5    asset kiosk operator at any time the Secretary chooses;6        (9) to examine the books and records of every digital 7    asset kiosk operator, affiliate, or service provider;8        (10) to enforce the provisions of this Act.9        (11) to levy fees, fines, and civil penalties, charges 10    for services, and assessments to defray operating 11    expenses, including direct and indirect costs, of 12    administering this Act.13        (12) to appoint examiners, supervisors, experts, and 14    special assistants as needed to effectively and 15    efficiently administer this Act.16        (13) to conduct hearings for the purpose of carrying 17    out the purposes of this Act;18        (14) to exercise visitorial power over a digital asset 19    kiosk operator, affiliate, or service provider;20        (15) to enter into cooperative agreements with federal 21    and State regulatory authorities and to accept reports of 22    examinations from federal and State regulatory 23    authorities;24        (16) to impose civil penalties against a digital asset 25    kiosk operator, affiliate, or service provider for failing 26    to respond to a regulatory request or reporting   SB2319 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    requirement;2        (17) to perform any other lawful acts necessary or 3    desirable to carry out the purposes and provisions of this 4    Act.5    (b) The Department may share any information obtained 6pursuant to this Act with law enforcement officials or other 7regulatory agencies. 8    Section 20. Funds.9    (a) All moneys collected or received by the Department 10under this Act shall be deposited into the Digital Asset Kiosk 11Fund. The amounts deposited into the Digital Asset Kiosk Fund 12shall be used for the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 13Department in administering this Act and other financial laws. 14Nothing in this Act shall prevent the continuation of the 15practice of paying expenses involving salaries, retirement, 16social security, and State-paid insurance of State officers 17and employees by appropriation from the General Revenue Fund 18or any other fund. Moneys deposited into the Digital Asset 19Kiosk Fund may be transferred to the Professions Indirect Cost 20Fund or any other Department fund.21    (b) The expenses of administering this Act, including 22investigations and examinations provided for in this Act, 23shall be borne by and assessed against persons regulated by 24this Act. The Department may establish fees by rule, including 25in the following categories:  SB2319 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        (1) investigation of registrants and registration 2    applicant fees;3        (2) examination fees;4        (3) contingent fees; and5        (4) such other categories as may be required to 6    administer this Act.7    (c) The Department shall charge and collect fees from 8digital asset kiosk operators, which shall be nonrefundable 9unless otherwise indicated, for the expenses of administering 10this Act as follows:11        (1) Each digital asset kiosk operator shall pay $150 12    for each hour or part of an hour for each examiner or staff 13    assigned to the supervision of the digital asset kiosk 14    operator plus actual travel costs for any examination 15    pursuant to the Act. Supervision of operators includes, 16    but is not limited to, examination, audit, visit, 17    registration, certification, review, investigation, or any 18    other regulatory activity conducted pursuant to this Act.19        (2) Each digital asset kiosk operator shall pay to the 20    Department its pro rata share of the cost for 21    administration of this Act that exceeds other fees listed 22    in this Act, as estimated by the Department, for the 23    current year and any deficit actually incurred in the 24    administration of the Act in prior years. The total annual 25    assessment for all registrants shall initially be divided 26    into a transaction-based assessment. Each registrant's pro   SB2319 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    rata share shall be based on the percentage of the total 2    United States dollar value of all digital asset kiosk 3    transactions by all registrants in Illinois per calendar 4    year.5    (d) The Department may, by rule, amend any fees set forth 6in this Act. The Department may establish additional fees by 7rule as set forth in this Section. 8    Section 25. Daily transaction limit. 9    (a) A digital asset kiosk operator shall not accept or 10dispense more than $2,500 or equivalent monetary value in a 11day from or to the same new customer through a digital asset 12kiosk.13    (b) A digital asset kiosk operator shall not accept or 14dispense more than $10,500 or the equivalent monetary value in 15a day from or to any existing customer through a digital asset 16kiosk. 17    Section 30. Customer charges limit. A digital asset kiosk 18operator may not, directly or indirectly, collect charges from 19a customer related to a single digital asset kiosk transaction 20that exceeds the greater of the following:21        (1) $5; or22        (2) 18% of digital assets involved in the transaction 23    according to the market price of the digital asset at the 24    time the customer initiates the transaction.   SB2319 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    Section 35. Customer disclosures.2    (a) Before engaging in each digital asset kiosk 3transaction with a customer, a digital asset kiosk operator 4shall provide written disclosure, in English and in the same 5language principally used by the digital asset kiosk operator 6to advertise, solicit, or negotiate with a customer, 7containing the terms and conditions of the transaction that 8include, at a minimum, all of the following:9        (1) The amount of the digital assets involved in the 10    transaction.11        (2) The amount, in United States dollars, of any 12    charges collected by the operator.13        (3) The United States dollar price of the digital 14    assets that is charged to the customer and the United 15    States dollar market price of the digital assets.16        (4) All procedures for providing refunds as required 17    by Section 45 of this Act and other methods to reverse or 18    refund a transaction offered by the digital asset kiosk 19    operator.20        (5) A warning written prominently in bold type stating 21    the following: "Warning: Losses due to fraudulent or 22    accidental transactions may not be recoverable and 23    transactions are irreversible except as otherwise set 24    forth in this disclosure.".25        (6) Digital assets are not legal tender, are not   SB2319 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    backed by the government, and accounts and value balances 2    are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation 3    or Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections.4        (7) Legislative and regulatory changes or actions at 5    the State, federal, or international level may adversely 6    affect the use, transfer, exchange, and value of digital 7    assets.8        (8) Some digital asset transactions shall be deemed to 9    be made when recorded on a public ledger, which is not 10    necessarily the date or time that the customer initiates 11    the transaction.12        (9) The value of a digital asset may be derived from 13    the continued willingness of market participants to 14    exchange fiat currency for digital assets, which may 15    result in the potential for permanent and total loss of 16    value of a particular digital asset should the market for 17    that digital asset disappear.18        (10) There is no assurance that a person who accepts a 19    digital asset as payment today will continue to do so in 20    the future.21        (11) The volatility and unpredictability of the price 22    of a digital asset relative to fiat currency may result in 23    significant loss over a short period of time.24        (12) The nature of digital assets may lead to an 25    increased risk of fraud or cyberattack.26        (13) The nature of digital assets means that any   SB2319 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    technological difficulties experienced by the digital 2    asset kiosk operator may prevent access or use of a 3    customer's digital assets.4        (14) Any bond or trust account maintained by the 5    digital asset kiosk operator for the benefit of its 6    customers may not be sufficient to cover all losses 7    incurred by customers.8    (b) The disclosures required by this Section shall be 9clear and conspicuous and provided separately from any other 10disclosure provided by the digital asset kiosk operator.11    (c) A digital asset kiosk operator shall provide a 12customer with a receipt for any transaction made at the 13digital asset kiosk operator's digital asset kiosk that 14includes all of the following information:15        (1) The name of the customer.16        (2) The date and time of the transaction.17        (3) The name and contact information of the digital 18    asset kiosk operator.19        (4) The amount of the digital assets and any digital 20    asset addresses involved in the transaction.21        (5) The amount of United States dollars or other fiat 22    currency involved in the transaction.23        (6) The amount, in United States dollars, of any 24    charges collected by the digital asset kiosk operator in 25    relation to the transaction.26        (7) The amount, in United States dollars, of any   SB2319 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    spread between the United States dollar price of the 2    digital asset that is charged to the customer and the 3    United States dollar market price of the digital asset.4        (8) All procedures for providing refunds as required 5    by this Act and any other methods to reverse or refund the 6    transaction offered by the digital asset kiosk operator. 7    Section 40. Reporting physical addresses.8    (a) A digital asset kiosk operator shall provide to the 9Department a list of all physical addresses of digital asset 10kiosks that the digital asset kiosk operator owns, operates, 11or manages in this State, in a form prescribed by the 12Department.13    (b) A digital asset kiosk operator shall provide the 14Department with updates to the list required by subsection (a) 15of this Section within 30 days after any changes in a form 16prescribed by the Department.17    (c) The Department shall make the list required by 18subsection (a) of this Section and contact information of each 19digital asset kiosk operator available to the public on the 20Department's website. 21    Section 41. Customer service. All digital asset kiosk 22operators performing business in this State must provide live 23customer service during kiosk operating hours. The customer 24service toll-free number must be displayed on the digital   SB2319 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1asset kiosk or on the digital asset kiosk screen. 2    Section 42. Prevention of fraudulent activity. All digital 3asset kiosk operators must take reasonable steps to detect and 4prevent fraud, including establishing and maintaining a 5written anti-fraud policy. 6    Section 43. Blockchain analytics. All digital asset kiosk 7operators must use blockchain analytics software to help 8prevent transactions to wallets known to be affiliated with 9fraudulent activity at the time of a transaction and to detect 10transaction patterns indicative of fraud or other illicit 11activities. 12    Section 44. Law enforcement access to investigative 13information. All digital asset kiosk operators performing 14business in this State must provide a dedicated communications 15line for relevant government agencies through a posted U.S. 16phone number or email address. This dedicated line shall 17facilitate law enforcement and regulatory agency 18communications with the digital asset kiosk operator in the 19event of a fraud report from a customer. The communications 20line must be frequently monitored. 21    Section 45. Refunds.22    (a) A digital asset kiosk operator must issue a refund to a   SB2319 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1new customer for the full amount for up to 3 fraudulent 2transactions made within the new customer period, upon request 3of the customer. To receive a refund under this subsection, a 4new customer must:5        (1) have been fraudulently induced to engage in a 6    transaction or transactions involving the digital asset 7    kiosk;8        (2) within 30 days after the last transaction to occur 9    during the new customer period, contact the digital asset 10    kiosk operator to inform them of the fraudulent nature of 11    the transaction or transactions at issue; and12        (3) within 60 days after the last transaction to occur 13    during the new customer period, submit a police report or 14    government agency report of the transaction or 15    transactions to the digital asset kiosk operator.16    (b) A digital asset kiosk operator must issue a refund to 17an existing customer for the full amount of all charges upon 18request of an existing customer. To receive a refund under 19this subsection, an existing customer must:20        (1) have been fraudulently induced to engage in a 21    transaction or transactions involving the digital asset 22    kiosk;23        (2) within 30 days after the transaction or 24    transactions at issue, contact the digital asset kiosk 25    operator to inform them of the fraudulent nature of the 26    transaction or transactions at issue; and  SB2319 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        (3) within 60 days after the transaction or 2    transactions at issue, submit a police report or 3    government agency report of the transaction or 4    transactions to the digital asset kiosk operator. 5    Section 50. Registration required.6    (a) A person shall not operate a digital asset kiosk in 7this State unless the person is registered with the Department 8pursuant to this Act or exempt from this Act.9    (b) A person with any operational digital asset kiosks in 10this State as of the effective date of this Act shall not be 11required to be registered with the Department until July 1, 122027. 13    Section 55. Applications.14    (a) An application for a registration under this Act shall 15meet all of the following requirements:16        (1) The application shall be in a form and medium 17    prescribed by the Department.18        (2) The application shall provide all of the following 19    information:20            (A) The name of the applicant and the address of 21        the principal place of business of the applicant and 22        the address of all locations and proposed locations of 23        the applicant in this State.24            (B) The form of business organization of the   SB2319 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        applicant, including:2                (i) a copy of its articles of incorporation 3            and amendments thereto and a certified copy of its 4            bylaws, if the applicant is a corporation;5                (ii) a copy of its partnership agreement, 6            certified by a partner, if the applicant is a 7            partnership; or;8                (iii) a copy of the documents that control its 9            organizational structure, certified by a managing 10            official, if the applicant is organized in some 11            other form.12            (C) The name, the business and home address, and a 13        chronological summary of the business experience, 14        material litigation history, and felony convictions 15        over the preceding 10 years of:16                (i) the proprietor, if the applicant is an 17            individual;18                (ii) every partner, if the applicant is a 19            partnership;20                (iii) each officer, director, and controlling, 21            person, if the applicant is a corporation; and22                (iv) each person in a position to exercise 23            control over, or direction of, the business of the 24            applicant, regardless of the form of organization 25            of the applicant.26            (D) Financial statements, not more than one year   SB2319 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        old, prepared in accordance with generally accepted 2        accounting principles and audited by a licensed public 3        accountant or certified public accountant showing the 4        financial condition of the applicant and an unaudited 5        balance sheet and statement of operation as of the 6        most recent quarterly report before the date of the 7        application, certified by the applicant or an officer 8        or partner thereof. If the applicant is a wholly owned 9        subsidiary or is eligible to file consolidated federal 10        income tax returns with its parent, however, unaudited 11        financial statements for the preceding year along with 12        the unaudited financial statements for the most recent 13        quarter may be submitted if accompanied by the audited 14        financial statements of the parent company for the 15        preceding year along with the unaudited financial 16        statement for the most recent quarter.17            (E) Filings of the applicant with the Securities 18        and Exchange Commission or similar foreign 19        governmental entity (English translation), if any.20            (F) A list of all other states in which the 21        applicant is licensed, registered, or the equivalent 22        and whether the license, registration, or equivalent 23        of the applicant for those purposes has ever been 24        withdrawn, refused, canceled, or suspended in any 25        other state, with full details.26            (G) A sample of any contracts, disclosures, or   SB2319 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        terms of service applicable to its digital asset kiosk 2        operations.3            (H) The name and business address of any digital 4        asset exchange or other person through which the 5        applicant intends to conduct any business regulated 6        under this Act.7            (I) A surety bond as required by Section 70 of this 8        Act.9            (J) A written statement that the applicant is in 10        full compliance with and agrees to continue to fully 11        comply with all State and federal statutes and 12        regulations relating to money laundering.13            (K) All additional information the Secretary 14        considers necessary in order to determine whether to 15        issue the applicant a license under this Act.16    (b) The application shall be accompanied by a 17nonrefundable fee of $5,000 to cover the costs of application 18review.19    (c) With good cause, the Secretary may waive, in part, any 20of the requirements of this Section. 21    Section 60. Refusal to issue registration.22    (a) The Secretary may refuse to issue or a registration 23if: (i) the application does not comply with this Act; (ii) the 24proposed business operations do not comply with this Act; 25(iii) the competence, experience, and integrity of the   SB2319 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1officers, directors, controlling persons, and proposed 2management personnel, if the applicant is a corporation, or 3the competence, experience, and integrity of the owners, 4partners, and proposed management personnel, if the applicant 5is a partnership or other entity however organized, indicate 6that it is not in the interest of the public to permit the 7applicant to be registered under this Act; or (iv) 8registration is otherwise not in the best interest of the 9public.10    (b) The Secretary shall issue a formal written notice of 11the denial of a license application within 30 days after the 12decision to deny the application. The Secretary shall set 13forth the specific reasons for the denial of the application 14in the notice of denial and serve the applicant, either 15personally or by certified mail. Service by certified mail 16shall be deemed completed when the notice is deposited into 17the U.S. Mail. An applicant whose application is denied by the 18Secretary under this Section may submit a written request for 19a hearing that shall include the particular reasons why the 20applicant believes that the decision to deny the application 21was incorrect, within 10 days after service of the notice of 22the denial. If an applicant submits a timely request for a 23hearing, the Secretary shall schedule a hearing after the 24request for a hearing unless otherwise agreed to by the 25parties. The Secretary shall conduct hearings pursuant to this 26Section and in accordance with 38 Ill. Adm. Code 100, as   SB2319 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1amended or recodified. 2    Section 65. Renewal.3    (a) A registration under this Act shall be renewed 4annually.5    (b) A registrant shall submit a renewal report, in a form 6and in a medium prescribed by the Secretary by December 1 of 7each year. The form requires any information deemed necessary 8by the Secretary to review a renewal application. At a 9minimum, the renewal report must state or contain a 10description of each material change in information submitted 11by the registration in its original registration application 12or in its business operations which has not been reported to 13the Secretary.14    (c) The Secretary may grant an extension of the renewal 15date. 16    Section 70. Surety bond.17    (a) An applicant for a registration must provide, and a 18registrant at all times must maintain, security consisting of 19a surety bond in a form satisfactory to the Secretary. The bond 20shall run to the State of Illinois for the benefit of any 21claimant against the applicant or registrant with respect to 22any operations regulated by this Act. A claimant damaged by a 23breach of the conditions of a bond shall have a right to action 24upon the bond for damages suffered thereby and may bring suit   SB2319 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1directly on the bond, or the Secretary may bring suit on behalf 2of the claimant.3    (b) The amount of the required security bond shall be the 4greater of $100,000 or an amount equal to 100% of the monthly 5dollar value of all digital asset kiosk transactions in this 6State calculated for the most recently completed quarter, up 7to a maximum of $2,000,000. 8    Section 75. Tangible net worth.9    (a) A registrant under this Act shall maintain at all 10times a tangible net worth of the greater of $100,000 or 3% of 11total assets for the first $100,000,000, 2% of additional 12assets for $100,000,000 to $1,000,000,000, and 0.5% of 13additional assets for over $1,000,000,000.14    (b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the Secretary shall 15have discretionary authority to exempt, in part or in whole, 16from the requirements of this Section any applicant or 17registrant. 18    Section 85. Enforcement generally.19    (a) Upon written notice to a digital asset kiosk operator, 20the Secretary may suspend or revoke any registration issued 21pursuant to this Act if, in the notice, the Secretary makes a 22finding of one or more of the following:23        (1) that any fact or condition exists that, if it had 24    existed at the time of the original application for the   SB2319 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    registration, would have warranted the Secretary in 2    refusing originally to issue the registration; or3        (2) that if a registrant is other than an individual, 4    any ultimate equitable owner, officer, director, or member 5    of the registration partnership, association, corporation, 6    or other entity has acted or failed to act in a way that 7    would be cause for suspending or revoking a registration 8    to that party as an individual; and 9        (3) any ground set forth in subsection (l).10    (b) No registration shall be suspended or revoked, except 11as provided in this Section, nor shall any digital asset kiosk 12operator be fined without notice of the right to a hearing as 13provided in this Section.14    (c) The Secretary, on good cause shown that an emergency 15exists, may suspend any registration for a period not 16exceeding 180 days, pending investigation.17    (d) No revocation, suspension, or surrender of any 18registration shall impair or affect the obligation of any 19preexisting lawful contract between the registrant and any 20person.21    (e) Every registration issued under this Act shall remain 22in force and effect until the registration expires without 23renewal, is surrendered, is revoked, or is suspended in 24accordance with the provisions of this Act, but the Secretary 25shall have authority to reinstate a suspended registration or 26to issue a new registration to a digital asset kiosk operator   SB2319 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1whose registration has been revoked if no fact or condition 2then exists which would have warranted the Secretary in 3refusing originally to issue that registration under this Act.4    (f) Whenever the Secretary revokes or suspends a 5registration issued pursuant to this Act or fines a digital 6asset kiosk operator under this Act, the Secretary shall 7execute a written order to that effect. The Secretary shall 8serve a copy of the order upon the digital asset kiosk 9operator.10    (g) If the Secretary finds any digital asset kiosk 11operator in violation of the grounds set forth in subsection 12(l), the Secretary may enter an order imposing one or more of 13the following penalties:14        (1) revocation of registration;15        (2) suspension of a registration subject to 16    reinstatement upon satisfying all reasonable conditions 17    the Secretary may specify;18        (3) placement of the digital asset kiosk operator or 19    applicant on probation for a period of time and subject to 20    all reasonable conditions as the Secretary may specify;21        (4) issuance of a reprimand;22        (5) imposition of a fine not to exceed $25,000 for 23    each count of separate offense; except that a fine may be 24    imposed that shall not exceed $75,000 for each separate 25    count of offense in violation of paragraph (2) or (14) of 26    subsection (l);  SB2319 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        (6) denial of a registration application; or2        (7) restitution for the benefit of any person.3    (h) The Secretary may issue a new registration to a 4digital asset kiosk operator whose registration has been 5revoked when facts or conditions which clearly would have 6warranted the Secretary in refusing originally to issue the 7registration no longer exist.8    (i) For every order issued pursuant to this Section, the 9Secretary shall serve the digital asset kiosk operator with 10notice of the Secretary's action, including a statement of the 11reasons for the actions, either personally or by certified 12mail. Service by certified mail shall be deemed completed when 13the notice is deposited in the U.S. mail.14    (j) Any order issued pursuant to this Section shall take 15effect upon service of the order unless the digital asset 16kiosk operator requests a hearing, in writing, within 10 days 17after the date of service. If a hearing is requested, the order 18shall be stayed until a final administrative order is entered 19except for an emergency revocation and suspension as set forth 20subsection (c).21        (1) If the digital asset kiosk operator requests a 22    hearing, the Secretary shall schedule a hearing within 90 23    days after the request for a hearing unless otherwise 24    agreed to by the parties.25        (2) The hearing shall be held at the time and place 26    designated by the Secretary. The Secretary and any   SB2319 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    administrative law judge designated by the Secretary shall 2    have the power to administer oaths and affirmations, 3    subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take 4    evidence, and require the production of books, papers, 5    correspondence, and other records or information that the 6    Secretary or the Secretary's designated administrative law 7    judge considers relevant or material to the inquiry.8    (k) The costs of administrative hearings conducted 9pursuant to this Section shall be paid by the digital asset 10kiosk operator.11    (l) The following acts shall constitute grounds for which 12the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (g) may be 13taken:14        (1) being convicted or found guilty, regardless of 15    pendency of an appeal, of a crime in any jurisdiction that 16    involves fraud, dishonest dealing, or any other act of 17    moral turpitude;18        (2) fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or negligence in 19    any relation to any transaction regulated under this Act;20        (3) a material or intentional misstatement of fact on 21    an initial or renewal application;22        (3.5) any fact or condition exists that, if it had 23    existed at the time of the original application for the 24    registration, would have warranted the Secretary in 25    refusing to originally issue the registration;26        (4) insolvency or filing under any provision of the   SB2319 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    United States Bankruptcy Code as a debtor;2        (5) failure to account or deliver to any person any 3    property, such as any money, fund, deposit, check, draft, 4    or other document or thing of value, that has come into a 5    digital asset kiosk operator's hands and that is not the 6    digital asset kiosk operator's property or that the 7    digital asset kiosk operator is not in law or equity 8    entitled to retain, under the circumstances and at the 9    time which has been agreed upon or is required by law, or, 10    in the absence of a fixed time, upon demand of the person 11    entitled to the accounting and delivery;12        (6) failure to disburse funds in accordance with 13    agreements;14        (7) having a registration, or the equivalent, to 15    practice any profession or occupation or operate any 16    business revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, 17    including the denial of licensure by a licensing authority 18    of this State or another State, territory, or country, for 19    fraud, dishonest dealing, or any other act of moral 20    turpitude;21        (8) failure to comply with an order of the Secretary;22        (9) engaging in activities regulated by this Act 23    without a current, active registration unless specifically 24    exempted by this Act;25        (10) failure to pay in a timely manner any fee, 26    charge, or fine under this Act;  SB2319 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        (11) failure to maintain, preserve, and keep available 2    for examination all books, accounts, or other documents 3    required by the provisions of this Act; 4        (12) refusing, obstructing, evading, or unreasonably 5    delaying an investigation, information request, or 6    examination authorized under this Act, or refusing, 7    obstructing, evading, or unreasonably delaying compliance 8    with the Secretary's subpoena or subpoena duces tecum;9        (13) failure to comply with or a violation of any 10    provision of this Act; and11        (14) any unfair, deceptive, or abusive business 12    practice. 13    Section 90. Cease and desist order.14    (a) The Secretary may issue a cease and desist order to any 15digital asset kiosk operator doing business without the 16required registration, when in the opinion of the Secretary 17the digital asset kiosk operator is violating or is about to 18violate any provision of this Act or requirement imposed in 19writing by the Department as a condition of granting any 20authorization permitted by this Act. The cease and desist 21order permitted by this Section may be issued before a 22hearing.23    (b) The Secretary shall serve notice of the Secretary's 24action, including, but not limited to, a statement of the 25reasons for the action, either personally or by certified   SB2319 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1mail. Service by certified mail shall be deemed completed when 2the notice is deposited in the U.S. Mail.3    (c) Within 10 days after service of the cease and desist 4order, the digital asset kiosk operator may request a hearing 5in writing. The Secretary shall schedule a hearing within 90 6days after the request for a hearing unless otherwise agreed 7to by the parties.8    (d) If it is determined that the Secretary had the 9authority to issue the cease and desist order, the Secretary 10may issue such orders as may be reasonably necessary to 11correct, eliminate, or remedy the conduct.12    (e) The powers vested in the Secretary by this Section are 13in addition to any and all other powers and remedies vested in 14the Secretary by law, and nothing in this Section shall be 15construed as requiring that the Secretary shall employ the 16power conferred in this subsection instead of or as a 17condition precedent to the exercise of any other power or 18remedy vested in the Secretary. 19    Section 95. Civil action. A claim of violation of Sections 2025, 30, and 45 of this Act may be asserted in a civil action. 21Additionally, a prevailing resident may be awarded reasonable 22attorney's fees and court costs. 23    Section 100. Rulemaking.24    (a) The Department may adopt rules to implement the   SB2319 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1provisions of this Act, including, but not limited to:2        (1) rules in connection with the activities of digital 3    asset kiosk operators as may be necessary and appropriate 4    for the protection of persons in this State;5        (2) rules as may be necessary and appropriate to 6    define improper or fraudulent business practices in 7    connection with the activities of digital asset kiosk 8    operators and digital asset kiosks;9        (3) rules that define the terms used in this Act and as 10    may be necessary and appropriate to interpret and 11    implement the provisions of this Act; and12        (4) rules as may be necessary for the implementation, 13    enforcement and administration of this Act.14    (b) The Secretary is hereby authorized and empowered to 15make specific rulings, demands, and findings that the 16Secretary deems necessary for the proper conduct of operators. 17    Section 105. Appeal and review.18    (a) The Department may, in accordance with the Illinois 19Administrative Procedure Act, adopt rules to provide for 20review within the Department of the Secretary's decisions 21affecting the rights of persons under this Act. The review 22shall provide for, at a minimum:23        (1) appointment of a hearing officer;24        (2) appropriate procedural rules, specific deadlines 25    for filings, and standards of evidence and of proof; and  SB2319 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1        (3) provision for apportioning costs among parties to 2    the appeal.3    (b) All final agency determinations of appeals to 4decisions of the Secretary may be reviewed in accordance with 5and under the provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 6Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by a court 7in review of any final administrative decision of the 8Secretary or of any final agency review of a decision of the 9Secretary may be taken as in other civil cases.10    (c) The Secretary shall conduct hearings pursuant to this 11Section and in accordance with 38 Ill. Adm. Code 100, as 12amended or recodified from time to time. 13    Section 110. Evasion. An agreement, contract, or 14transaction that is structured to evade the scope of this Act 15shall be deemed to fall within the scope of this Act. 16    Section 115. Injunction. The Secretary may, through the 17Attorney General, maintain an action in the name of the people 18of the State of Illinois and may apply for an injunction in the 19Circuit Court to enjoin a person from violating this Act. 20    Section 120. Applicability. This Act governs any digital 21asset kiosk located in this State.  22    Section 125. Exemptions.  SB2319 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    (a) This Act does not apply to the following persons:2        (1) The United States; other states or political 3    subdivisions of another state; agencies or 4    instrumentalities of the federal government, another 5    state, or local government; or a foreign government or a 6    subdivision, department, agency, or instrumentality of a 7    foreign government.8        (2) A federally insured depository institution.9        (3) A credit union with member share accounts insured 10    by an insurer approved by the credit union's primary 11    financial regulatory agency. An out-of-State credit union 12    may not conduct any activity in this State that is not 13    authorized for a credit union chartered under the laws of 14    this State.15    (b) Nothing in this Act grants persons described in this 16subsection (a) the authority to engage in any activity not 17otherwise granted under existing law.18    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 19Department, by rule or order, may conditionally or 20unconditionally exempt any person, or any class of person or 21classes of persons, digital asset, or transaction from any 22provision of this Act or any rule adopted pursuant to this Act, 23to the extent that the exemption is necessary or appropriate, 24in the public interest, and consistent with the protection of 25residents.   SB2319 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 09000 BAB 19056 b1    Section 800. If and only if Senate Bill 1797 of the 104th 2General Assembly, as amended by House Amendment No. 1, becomes 3law, then Sections 15, 20, 50, 55, 60, 65, 70, 75, 85, 90, 105, 4115, 120, and 125 of this Act are repealed on the date that 5Senate Bill 1797 of the 104th General Assembly becomes law. 6    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 7Section 5.1030 as follows: 8    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)9    Sec. 5.1030. The Digital Asset Kiosk Fund. If and only if 10Senate Bill 1797 of the 104th General Assembly, as amended by 11House Amendment No. 1, becomes law, this Section is repealed. 12    Section 997. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 13severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 14    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.